Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-53] Revocation of
interlocutory orders. Any interlocutory order under this chapter, made
upon the court's own motion, may be revoked, modified, or extended by it upon
appropriate notice to the parties. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next